Utah statutes.
70A-4-403.   Customer's right to stop-payment -- Burden of proof of loss.
(1)  A customer or any person authorized to draw on the account if there is
more than one person, may stop payment of any item drawn on the customer's
account or close the account by an order to the bank describing the item or
account with reasonable certainty received at a time and in a manner that
affords the bank a reasonable opportunity to act on it before any action by
the bank with respect to the item described in Section 70A-4-303.  If the
signature of more than one person is required to draw on an account, any of
these persons may stop payment or close the account.
(2)  A stop-payment order is effective for six months, but it lapses after 14
calendar days if the original order was oral and was not confirmed in writing
within that period.  A stop-payment order may be renewed for additional six-
month periods by a writing given to the bank within a period during which the
stop-payment order is effective.
(3)  The burden of establishing the fact and amount of loss resulting from the
payment of an item contrary to a stop-payment order or order to close account
is on the customer.  The loss from payment of an item contrary to a stop-
payment order may include damages for dishonor of subsequent items and Section
70A-4-402.
